Arkansas, session 2025, SB453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 2-22-101(14), concerning the definition of
the State Apiarist related to the regulation of bees and apiaries, is amended
to read as follows:
(14) “State Apiarist” means the Director of the Division of Plant
Industries of the State Plant Board Secretary of the Department of
Agriculture.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 2-33-104 is amended to read as follows:
2-33-104. Director Duties of the Secretary of the Department of
Agriculture.
(a)(1) The Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission
shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the
*CRH253*
03/13/2025 9:58:47 AM CRH253

SB453
Governor.
(2) The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department
of Agriculture.
(b)(1) The secretary Secretary of the Department of Agriculture may
delegate to the director any of the powers or duties required to administer
the:
(A) Statutory duties of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry
Commission; and
(B) Rules, orders, or directives promulgated or issued by
the commission.
(2) The director secretary may exercise the powers and duties
delegated to him or her under subdivision (b)(1) of under this section in the
name of the commission and of the Department of Agriculture.


SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 2-40-206(a)(1)(B)(i), concerning the
authority of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to promulgate an
emergency rule related to bovine disease if an emergency is determined,
amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) However, if the Director of the Arkansas Livestock
and Poultry Commission Secretary of the Department of Agriculture determines
there is an emergency, the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission may
promulgate a rule to temporarily raise the fee set in subdivision (a)(1)(A)
of this section after receiving approval of the rule from the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 15-31-103(b), concerning the State
Forester's membership on the Arkansas Forestry Commission, is amended to read
as follows:
(b) The State Forester Secretary of the Department of Agriculture
provided for in § 15-31-104 shall be an ex officio member of the Arkansas
Forestry Commission commission but shall have no vote on matters coming
before it.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 15-31-104 is amended to read as follows:
03/13/2025 9:58:47 AM CRH253

SB453
15-31-104. State Forester.
(a) The State Forester shall be appointed by the Governor, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
(b) The State Forester shall report to the Secretary of the Department
of Agriculture Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall act as the
State Forester.
(c)(1)(b)(1) The secretary may delegate to the State Forester any of
the powers or duties required to administer the:
(A) Statutory duties of the Arkansas Forestry Commission;
and
(B) Rules, orders, or directives promulgated or issued by
the commission.
(2) The State Forester secretary may exercise the powers and
duties delegated to him or her under subdivision (c)(1)(b)(1) of this section
in the name of the commission and the department Department of Agriculture.
(3) The commission may delegate to the department any of the
powers or duties vested in or imposed upon the commission by law, and these
delegated powers or duties may be exercised by the secretary or his or her
designee.
(d)(c) The State Forester secretary shall:
(1) Have earned at a minimum a bachelor's degree in forestry
from an accredited four-year program at an institution of higher education;
and
(2) Have not less than three (3) years' practical administrative
and field experience in forestry.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 15-31-116(b)(2), concerning liability
related to donated fire control or fire rescue equipment, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) The commission, the State Forester, the Department of
Agriculture, the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture, and other
officers and employees of the department are not liable in civil damages for
personal injury, property damage, or death resulting from a defect in
equipment sold, loaned, or otherwise made available in good faith by the
State Forester secretary under this section unless the act or omission of the
commission, the State Forester, the department, the secretary, or the officer
03/13/2025 9:58:47 AM CRH253

SB453
or employee of the department proximately causing the claim, damage, or loss
constitutes malice, gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional
misconduct.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 15-31-201 is amended to read as follows:
15-31-201. Administration.
The administration of the provisions of this subchapter shall be under
the direction of the State Forester Secretary of the Department of
Agriculture.

SECTION 8. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 15-31-202(b),
concerning the provision of technical assistance to a forest landowner, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) Upon receipt of a request from a forest landowner for technical
forestry assistance or service, the State Forester Secretary of the
Department of Agriculture or his or her authorized agent may:

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 15-31-203 is amended to read as follows:
15-31-203. Payment for services — Free services.
(a) For designating, measuring, or estimating services, the landowner
or his or her agent, upon presentation of a statement, shall pay to the State
Forester Secretary of the Department of Agriculture, within thirty (30) days
of receipt of the statement, an amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of the
sale price or fair market value of the stumpage so designated and measured or
estimated.
(b) However, for the purpose of further encouraging the use of
approved scientific forestry principles on the private forest lands of this
state and to permit explanation of the application of principles, the State
Forester secretary, where he or she deems it advisable, may designate and
measure or estimate without charge the trees of a forest landowner on an area
not in excess of eighty (80) acres.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 15-31-205 is amended to read as follows:
15-31-205. Disposition of revenues.
All moneys collected under the provisions of this subchapter shall be
deposited with the State Forester Secretary of the Department of Agriculture
03/13/2025 9:58:47 AM CRH253

SB453
and shall be used by him or her in carrying out the provisions of this
subchapter.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 15-33-102 is amended to read as follows:
15-33-102. State Forester Secretary of the Department of Agriculture as
compact administrator.
The State Forester Secretary of the Department of Agriculture is
designated as the South Central Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact
administrator for this state and shall consult with like officials of the
other member states and shall implement cooperation between member states in
forest fire prevention and control.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 15-57-315(8)(A), concerning authorization
for the Division of Environmental Quality's approval of an operator of an
open-cut mine's reclamation plan to be based on advice and technical
assistance from certain stakeholders, is amended to read as follows:
(8)(A) The division's approval of the operator's reclamation
plan may be based upon the advice and technical assistance of the Arkansas
Natural Resources Commission, the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission,
the State Forester Secretary of the Department of Agriculture, the Office of
the State Geologist, and other agencies or persons having experience in
foresting and reclaiming open-cut mined lands with forest or agronomic or
horticultural species, based upon scientific knowledge from research into
reclaiming and utilizing forest and agronomic species on open-cut mined
lands.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 25-38-202(b)(2), concerning the
appointment of the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture, is amended to
read as follows:
(2)(A)(i) The secretary shall be selected by the Governor and
confirmed by the Senate.
(ii) A committee composed of members of the Senate
whose districts have agriculture as the primary industry as determined by the
Governor first shall confirm an individual selected as secretary before the
individual selected as secretary is confirmed by the Senate.
(B)(i) The secretary shall serve at the pleasure of the
03/13/2025 9:58:47 AM CRH253

SB453
Governor.
(ii) The reappointment of the secretary shall follow
the process provided under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.

SECTION 14. DO NOT CODIFY. Elimination of positions.
(a) The General Assembly intends with this act for the following
positions at the Department of Agriculture and its divisions to be eliminated
and not be filled:
(1) Deputy Secretary of the Department of Agriculture, position
number 22133710, authorized job U072U, authorized grade SE02;
(2) Laboratory Director of the Department of Agriculture,
position number 22142797, authorized job U057U, authorized grade SE01;
(3) Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission,
position number 22177528, authorized job U048U, authorized grade SE01;
(4) Director of the Natural Resources Division, position number
22087699, authorized job U043U, authorized grade SE01;
(5) Director of the Plant Industry Division, position number
22088003, authorized job U044U, authorized grade SE01;
(6) State Forester, position number 22088666, authorized job
U003U, authorized grade SE01; and
(7) General Counsel of the Department of Agriculture, position
number 22181808, authorized job G345C, authorized grade GS15.
(b) To the extent a position listed in subdivision (a)(1) of this
section is filled at the effective date of this act, the individual filling
the position shall be terminated, and the position shall not be filled
following the termination.
(c) To the extent that an appropriation bill or a substantive bill
enacted by the General Assembly conflicts with this bill draft regarding the
positions identified in subsection (a) of this section, this bill draft shall
supersede the other bill draft as it relates to the positions identified in
subsection (a) of this section.

SECTION 15. DO NOT CODIFY. Reappointment of the Secretary of the
Department of Agriculture.
The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture who is in the position
at the effective date of this act shall be reappointed, including without
03/13/2025 9:58:47 AM CRH253

SB453
limitation by submittal to the Senate for confirmation under Section 13 of
this act within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act.


































03/13/2025 9:58:47 AM CRH253